Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1481.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.998] SKIN-LIGHTENER NOTICE REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Notice required. new text end new text begin After August 1, 2026, the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must send a notice to retailers who sell skin-lightening products which states that selling skin-lightening products that contain mercury is illegal and subject to penalties. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Certification. new text end new text begin Businesses who receive notice from the commissioner must self-certify on a form prescribed by the commissioner that they have received the notice and will comply with the law. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Penalties. new text end new text begin Businesses who fail to self-certify may be subject to a fine not to exceed $........ new text end